src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s61_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - æra: # 
    halda+V+Inf: halda
    halda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: heldur
    halda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hildu
    halda+V+Sup: hildið
    halda+V+Inf: halda
    
